Hawaii statutes.
[§127A-6] Emergency reserve corps.
(a) The director may establish an emergency reserve corps comprising trained
specialists to support state and county emergency or disaster requirements.
The emergency reserve corps may include:

(1) Any employee of the State or county;

(2) Any employee hired specifically for staffing
during emergency periods and exercises who shall be hired and compensated
without regard to chapters 76, 78, and 88; and

(3) Any volunteer,

who shall be detailed in accordance with this
chapter. Emergency reserve corps positions shall be authorized and managed by
the agency and do not need the approval of the governor.

(b) The emergency reserve corps shall support
state emergency or disaster requirements and, if requested by a county emergency
management agency, supplement the county emergency management agency staff.
The emergency reserve corps may be mobilized during, or in advance of,
emergencies or disasters, or for emergency management exercises and training
events. Emergency reserve corps members shall attend a minimum of four days of
paid training per year. [L 2014, c 111, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next